Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.391

United States vocational education account—Appropriations to be paid from general fund.

From and after the first day of July, 1957, all appropriations made by the thirty-fifth legislature from the United States vocational education account shall be paid out of moneys in the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.391. Prior: 1957 c 226 s 2.]